Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2631
Insurance consultant; commission or compensation; receipt; unlawful; when.

It shall be unlawful for any consultant, or any agency or sales organization with which he or she is connected, to receive any part of any commission or compensation paid by an insurer or agent of an insurer in connection with the sale or writing of any insurance which is within the subject matter of any consulting service performed prior to the sale of insurance and for which such consultant has contracted to receive a fee. For purposes of this section, a renewal of insurance shall not be considered a sale of insurance.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 26;

Laws 1981, LB 57, § 2.